Illinois, session 104th, SB1492.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 10-30 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/10-30)7    Sec. 10-30. Subdivisions; counties of less than 3,000,000. 8    (a) In counties with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the 9platting and subdivision of property into separate lots and 10the development of the subdivided property with streets, 11sidewalks, curbs, gutters, sewer, water and utility lines 12shall not increase the assessed valuation of all or any part of 13the property, if: 14        (1) The property is platted and subdivided in 15    accordance with the Plat Act; 16        (2) The platting occurs after January 1, 1978; 17        (3) At the time of platting the property is in excess 18    of 5 acres; and 19        (4) At the time of platting the property is vacant or 20    used as a farm as defined in Section 1-60.21    (b) Except as provided in subsections subsection (c), 22(c-5), and (c-10) of this Section, the assessed valuation of 23property so platted and subdivided shall be determined each   SB1492- 2 -LRB104 03069 HLH 13087 b1year based on the estimated price the property would bring at a 2fair voluntary sale for use by the buyer for the same purposes 3for which the property was used when last assessed prior to its 4platting.5    (c) Upon completion of a habitable structure on any lot of 6subdivided property, or upon the use of any lot, either alone 7or in conjunction with any contiguous property, for any 8business, commercial or residential purpose, or upon the 9initial sale of any platted lot, including a platted lot which 10is vacant: (i) the provisions of subsection (b) of this 11Section shall no longer apply in determining the assessed 12valuation of the lot, (ii) each lot shall be assessed without 13regard to any provision of this Section, and (iii) the 14assessed valuation of the remaining property, when next 15determined, shall be reduced proportionately to reflect the 16exclusion of the property that no longer qualifies for 17valuation under this Section. Holding or offering a platted 18lot for initial sale shall not constitute a use of the lot for 19business, commercial or residential purposes unless a 20habitable structure is situated on the lot or unless the lot is 21otherwise used for a business, commercial or residential 22purpose.23    (c-5) Beginning with the 2025 taxable year, no property's 24assessed value shall be reduced to less than $150 under this 25Section. 26    (c-10) Beginning with the 2035 taxable year, no property   SB1492- 3 -LRB104 03069 HLH 13087 b1shall be eligible for calculation of its assessed value under 2this Section for more than a 10-year period. 3    (d) This Section applies before the effective date of this 4amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly and then applies 5again beginning January 1, 2012. 6(Source: P.A. 95-135, eff. 1-1-08; 96-480, eff. 8-14-09.)